src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
! personal:
!! 	         first	            second	third
!! singular	che	                nde	    ha'e	
!! plural	ñande (inclusive),   peẽ	ha'ekuéra/ hikuái
!!          ore (exclusive)

LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;

LEXICON Personal
# ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
# ;

LEXICON Reflexive
# ;
